Washington statutes.
RCW 7.42.060

Knowledge of contents chargeable after service.

Every person, firm, or corporation who sells, distributes, or acquires possession with intent to sell or distribute any of the matter described in RCW 7.42.020, after the service upon him or her of a summons and complaint in an action brought by the prosecuting attorney pursuant to this chapter is chargeable with knowledge of the contents thereof.

[ 2011 c 336 s 204; 1959 c 105 s 6.]